Illinois, session 104th, SB1834.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Job 5Creation Zone Pilot Program Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Agreement" means an agreement between the taxpayer and 8the Department for credit awards under this Act.9    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 10Opportunity.11    "Incremental income tax" means the total amount withheld 12during the reporting period from the compensation of new 13employees under Article 7 of the Illinois Income Tax Act 14arising from employment at a project that is the subject of an 15agreement.16    "New employee" means a full-time employee who (i) is first 17employed by a taxpayer in the project that is the subject of an 18agreement under this Act, (ii) is hired after the taxpayer 19enters into the tax credit agreement, (iii) receives 20compensation from the taxpayer that is at least 125% of the 21State minimum wage during the entire time he or she is 22considered a new employee, and (iv) is eligible for 23employer-sponsored group health insurance benefits and   SB1834- 2 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1retirement benefits as a condition of his or her employment 2with the taxpayer. The term "new employee" does not include:3        (1) an employee of the taxpayer who performs a job 4    that was previously performed by another employee, if that 5    job existed for at least 6 months before hiring the 6    employee; notwithstanding this paragraph, an employee may 7    be considered a new employee if the employee performs a 8    job that was previously performed by an employee who was:9            (A) treated under the agreement as a new employee; 10        and 11            (B) promoted by the taxpayer to another job;12        (2) an employee of the taxpayer who was previously 13    employed in Illinois by a related member of the taxpayer 14    and whose employment was shifted to the taxpayer after the 15    taxpayer entered into the agreement under this Act; or 16        (3) a child, grandchild, parent, or spouse, other than 17    a spouse who is legally separated from the individual, of 18    any individual who has a direct or an indirect ownership 19    interest of at least 5% in the profits, capital, or value 20    of the taxpayer.21    "Project" means employment in one or more of the following 22fields: manufacturing, technology, research, science, 23mathematics, engineering, construction, energy, 24bioprocessing, or agriculture.25    "Related member" means a person that, with respect to the 26taxpayer during any portion of the taxable year, is any one of   SB1834- 3 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1the following:2        (1) an individual stockholder, if the stockholder and 3    the members of the stockholder's family (as defined in 4    Section 318 of the Internal Revenue Code) own directly, 5    indirectly, beneficially, or constructively, in the 6    aggregate, at least 50% of the value of the taxpayer's 7    outstanding stock;8        (2) a partnership, estate, or trust and any partner or 9    beneficiary, if the partnership, estate, or trust, and its 10    partners or beneficiaries own directly, indirectly, 11    beneficially, or constructively, in the aggregate, at 12    least 50% of the profits, capital, stock, or value of the 13    taxpayer;14        (3) a corporation, and any party related to the 15    corporation in a manner that would require an attribution 16    of stock from the corporation to the party or from the 17    party to the corporation under the attribution rules of 18    Section 318 of the Internal Revenue Code, if the taxpayer 19    owns directly, indirectly, beneficially, or constructively 20    at least 50% of the value of the corporation's outstanding 21    stock;22        (4) a corporation and any party related to that 23    corporation in a manner that would require an attribution 24    of stock from the corporation to the party or from the 25    party to the corporation under the attribution rules of 26    Section 318 of the Internal Revenue Code, if the   SB1834- 4 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1    corporation and all such related parties own in the 2    aggregate at least 50% of the profits, capital, stock, or 3    value of the taxpayer; or4        (5) a person to or from whom there is attribution of 5    stock ownership in accordance with Section 1563(e) of the 6    Internal Revenue Code, except, for purposes of determining 7    whether a person is a related member under this paragraph, 8    20% shall be substituted for 5% wherever 5% appears in 9    Section 1563(e) of the Internal Revenue Code. 10    Section 10. Zone created. A job creation zone pilot 11program is hereby created. The job creation zone shall have 12the following boundaries:13        Beginning at the intersection of US-51 and State Route 14    9; then East to the Indiana State Line; then South along 15    the border between Illinois and Indiana; then West along 16    Interstate 64 to US-51; then North along US-51 to the 17    Point of Beginning; the job creation zone also includes 18    all of the territory within 15 miles of the North, South, 19    and West borders set forth in this Section. 20    Section 15. Tax credit awards; application. 21    (a) The Department shall make credit awards under this Act 22to foster job creation within the job creation zone. To be 23eligible for credits under this Act, the applicant must pledge 24to hire at least 5 new employees at a designated location   SB1834- 5 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1within the job creation zone.2    (b) An applicant may request a credit award by formal 3written letter of request or by formal application to the 4Department, in which the applicant states its intent to hire 5at least 5 new employees at a designated location within the 6job creation zone. As circumstances require, the Department 7may require a formal application from an applicant and a 8formal letter of request for assistance.9    (c) The Department may not make a credit award for a 10project at a location that was used by a different employer 11during the previous year if the applicant will employ the same 12number of employees or fewer employees (including new 13employees) at that project location.14    (d) The Department may make credit awards for withholding 15reporting periods beginning on or after January 1, 2026. 16    Section 25. Tax credit awards; amount. Any taxpayer that 17has been issued a certificate of exemption by the Department 18under this Act may claim a credit against its obligation to pay 19over withholding under Section 704A of the Illinois Income Tax 20Act. The amount of the credit may not exceed (i) 50% of the 21incremental income tax attributable to each new employee 22during the calendar year in which the new employee is hired and 23for the first 2 calendar years after the new employee is hired 24and (ii) 25% of the incremental income tax attributable to 25each new employee during the third and fourth calendar years   SB1834- 6 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1after the new employee is hired. 2    Section 30. Rulemaking. The Department may adopt rules to 3implement and enforce the provisions of this Act. 4    Section 900. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 704A as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/704A)7    Sec. 704A. Employer's return and payment of tax withheld.8    (a) In general, every employer who deducts and withholds 9or is required to deduct and withhold tax under this Act on or 10after January 1, 2008 shall make those payments and returns as 11provided in this Section.12    (b) Returns. Every employer shall, in the form and manner 13required by the Department, make returns with respect to taxes 14withheld or required to be withheld under this Article 7 for 15each quarter beginning on or after January 1, 2008, on or 16before the last day of the first month following the close of 17that quarter.18    (c) Payments. With respect to amounts withheld or required 19to be withheld on or after January 1, 2008:20        (1) Semi-weekly payments. For each calendar year, each 21    employer who withheld or was required to withhold more 22    than $12,000 during the one-year period ending on June 30 23    of the immediately preceding calendar year, payment must   SB1834- 7 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1    be made:2            (A) on or before each Friday of the calendar year, 3        for taxes withheld or required to be withheld on the 4        immediately preceding Saturday, Sunday, Monday, or 5        Tuesday;6            (B) on or before each Wednesday of the calendar 7        year, for taxes withheld or required to be withheld on 8        the immediately preceding Wednesday, Thursday, or 9        Friday.10        Beginning with calendar year 2011, payments made under 11    this paragraph (1) of subsection (c) must be made by 12    electronic funds transfer. 13        (2) Semi-weekly payments. Any employer who withholds 14    or is required to withhold more than $12,000 in any 15    quarter of a calendar year is required to make payments on 16    the dates set forth under item (1) of this subsection (c) 17    for each remaining quarter of that calendar year and for 18    the subsequent calendar year. 19        (3) Monthly payments. Each employer, other than an 20    employer described in items (1) or (2) of this subsection, 21    shall pay to the Department, on or before the 15th day of 22    each month the taxes withheld or required to be withheld 23    during the immediately preceding month.24        (4) Payments with returns. Each employer shall pay to 25    the Department, on or before the due date for each return 26    required to be filed under this Section, any tax withheld   SB1834- 8 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1    or required to be withheld during the period for which the 2    return is due and not previously paid to the Department.3    (d) Regulatory authority. The Department may, by rule:4        (1) Permit employers, in lieu of the requirements of 5    subsections (b) and (c), to file annual returns due on or 6    before January 31 of the year for taxes withheld or 7    required to be withheld during the previous calendar year 8    and, if the aggregate amounts required to be withheld by 9    the employer under this Article 7 (other than amounts 10    required to be withheld under Section 709.5) do not exceed 11    $1,000 for the previous calendar year, to pay the taxes 12    required to be shown on each such return no later than the 13    due date for such return.14        (2) Provide that any payment required to be made under 15    subsection (c)(1) or (c)(2) is deemed to be timely to the 16    extent paid by electronic funds transfer on or before the 17    due date for deposit of federal income taxes withheld 18    from, or federal employment taxes due with respect to, the 19    wages from which the Illinois taxes were withheld.20        (3) Designate one or more depositories to which 21    payment of taxes required to be withheld under this 22    Article 7 must be paid by some or all employers.23        (4) Increase the threshold dollar amounts at which 24    employers are required to make semi-weekly payments under 25    subsection (c)(1) or (c)(2).26    (e) Annual return and payment. Every employer who deducts   SB1834- 9 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1and withholds or is required to deduct and withhold tax from a 2person engaged in domestic service employment, as that term is 3defined in Section 3510 of the Internal Revenue Code, may 4comply with the requirements of this Section with respect to 5such employees by filing an annual return and paying the taxes 6required to be deducted and withheld on or before the 15th day 7of the fourth month following the close of the employer's 8taxable year. The Department may allow the employer's return 9to be submitted with the employer's individual income tax 10return or to be submitted with a return due from the employer 11under Section 1400.2 of the Unemployment Insurance Act.12    (f) Magnetic media and electronic filing. With respect to 13taxes withheld in calendar years prior to 2017, any W-2 Form 14that, under the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 15promulgated thereunder, is required to be submitted to the 16Internal Revenue Service on magnetic media or electronically 17must also be submitted to the Department on magnetic media or 18electronically for Illinois purposes, if required by the 19Department.20    With respect to taxes withheld in 2017 and subsequent 21calendar years, the Department may, by rule, require that any 22return (including any amended return) under this Section and 23any W-2 Form that is required to be submitted to the Department 24must be submitted on magnetic media or electronically. 25    The due date for submitting W-2 Forms shall be as 26prescribed by the Department by rule.   SB1834- 10 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1    (g) For amounts deducted or withheld after December 31, 22009, a taxpayer who makes an election under subsection (f) of 3Section 5-15 of the Economic Development for a Growing Economy 4Tax Credit Act for a taxable year shall be allowed a credit 5against payments due under this Section for amounts withheld 6during the first calendar year beginning after the end of that 7taxable year equal to the amount of the credit for the 8incremental income tax attributable to full-time employees of 9the taxpayer awarded to the taxpayer by the Department of 10Commerce and Economic Opportunity under the Economic 11Development for a Growing Economy Tax Credit Act for the 12taxable year and credits not previously claimed and allowed to 13be carried forward under Section 211(4) of this Act as 14provided in subsection (f) of Section 5-15 of the Economic 15Development for a Growing Economy Tax Credit Act. The credit 16or credits may not reduce the taxpayer's obligation for any 17payment due under this Section to less than zero. If the amount 18of the credit or credits exceeds the total payments due under 19this Section with respect to amounts withheld during the 20calendar year, the excess may be carried forward and applied 21against the taxpayer's liability under this Section in the 22succeeding calendar years as allowed to be carried forward 23under paragraph (4) of Section 211 of this Act. The credit or 24credits shall be applied to the earliest year for which there 25is a tax liability. If there are credits from more than one 26taxable year that are available to offset a liability, the   SB1834- 11 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1earlier credit shall be applied first. Each employer who 2deducts and withholds or is required to deduct and withhold 3tax under this Act and who retains income tax withholdings 4under subsection (f) of Section 5-15 of the Economic 5Development for a Growing Economy Tax Credit Act must make a 6return with respect to such taxes and retained amounts in the 7form and manner that the Department, by rule, requires and pay 8to the Department or to a depositary designated by the 9Department those withheld taxes not retained by the taxpayer. 10For purposes of this subsection (g), the term taxpayer shall 11include taxpayer and members of the taxpayer's unitary 12business group as defined under paragraph (27) of subsection 13(a) of Section 1501 of this Act. This Section is exempt from 14the provisions of Section 250 of this Act. No credit awarded 15under the Economic Development for a Growing Economy Tax 16Credit Act for agreements entered into on or after January 1, 172015 may be credited against payments due under this Section.18    (g-1) For amounts deducted or withheld after December 31, 192024, a taxpayer who makes an election under the Reimagining 20Energy and Vehicles in Illinois Act shall be allowed a credit 21against payments due under this Section for amounts withheld 22during the first quarterly reporting period beginning after 23the certificate is issued equal to the portion of the REV 24Illinois Credit attributable to the incremental income tax 25attributable to new employees and retained employees as 26certified by the Department of Commerce and Economic   SB1834- 12 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1Opportunity pursuant to an agreement with the taxpayer under 2the Reimagining Energy and Vehicles in Illinois Act for the 3taxable year. The credit or credits may not reduce the 4taxpayer's obligation for any payment due under this Section 5to less than zero. If the amount of the credit or credits 6exceeds the total payments due under this Section with respect 7to amounts withheld during the quarterly reporting period, the 8excess may be carried forward and applied against the 9taxpayer's liability under this Section in the succeeding 10quarterly reporting period as allowed to be carried forward 11under paragraph (4) of Section 211 of this Act. The credit or 12credits shall be applied to the earliest quarterly reporting 13period for which there is a tax liability. If there are credits 14from more than one quarterly reporting period that are 15available to offset a liability, the earlier credit shall be 16applied first. Each employer who deducts and withholds or is 17required to deduct and withhold tax under this Act and who 18retains income tax withholdings this subsection must make a 19return with respect to such taxes and retained amounts in the 20form and manner that the Department, by rule, requires and pay 21to the Department or to a depositary designated by the 22Department those withheld taxes not retained by the taxpayer. 23For purposes of this subsection (g-1), the term taxpayer shall 24include taxpayer and members of the taxpayer's unitary 25business group as defined under paragraph (27) of subsection 26(a) of Section 1501 of this Act. This Section is exempt from   SB1834- 13 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1the provisions of Section 250 of this Act. 2    (g-2) For amounts deducted or withheld after December 31, 32024, a taxpayer who makes an election under the Manufacturing 4Illinois Chips for Real Opportunity (MICRO) Act shall be 5allowed a credit against payments due under this Section for 6amounts withheld during the first quarterly reporting period 7beginning after the certificate is issued equal to the portion 8of the MICRO Illinois Credit attributable to the incremental 9income tax attributable to new employees and retained 10employees as certified by the Department of Commerce and 11Economic Opportunity pursuant to an agreement with the 12taxpayer under the Manufacturing Illinois Chips for Real 13Opportunity (MICRO) Act for the taxable year. The credit or 14credits may not reduce the taxpayer's obligation for any 15payment due under this Section to less than zero. If the amount 16of the credit or credits exceeds the total payments due under 17this Section with respect to amounts withheld during the 18quarterly reporting period, the excess may be carried forward 19and applied against the taxpayer's liability under this 20Section in the succeeding quarterly reporting period as 21allowed to be carried forward under paragraph (4) of Section 22211 of this Act. The credit or credits shall be applied to the 23earliest quarterly reporting period for which there is a tax 24liability. If there are credits from more than one quarterly 25reporting period that are available to offset a liability, the 26earlier credit shall be applied first. Each employer who   SB1834- 14 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1deducts and withholds or is required to deduct and withhold 2tax under this Act and who retains income tax withholdings 3this subsection must make a return with respect to such taxes 4and retained amounts in the form and manner that the 5Department, by rule, requires and pay to the Department or to a 6depositary designated by the Department those withheld taxes 7not retained by the taxpayer. For purposes of this subsection, 8the term taxpayer shall include taxpayer and members of the 9taxpayer's unitary business group as defined under paragraph 10(27) of subsection (a) of Section 1501 of this Act. This 11Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 250 of this 12Act.13    (h) An employer may claim a credit against payments due 14under this Section for amounts withheld during the first 15calendar year ending after the date on which a tax credit 16certificate was issued under Section 35 of the Small Business 17Job Creation Tax Credit Act. The credit shall be equal to the 18amount shown on the certificate, but may not reduce the 19taxpayer's obligation for any payment due under this Section 20to less than zero. If the amount of the credit exceeds the 21total payments due under this Section with respect to amounts 22withheld during the calendar year, the excess may be carried 23forward and applied against the taxpayer's liability under 24this Section in the 5 succeeding calendar years. The credit 25shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 26liability. If there are credits from more than one calendar   SB1834- 15 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1year that are available to offset a liability, the earlier 2credit shall be applied first. This Section is exempt from the 3provisions of Section 250 of this Act. 4    (i) Each employer with 50 or fewer full-time equivalent 5employees during the reporting period may claim a credit 6against the payments due under this Section for each qualified 7employee in an amount equal to the maximum credit allowable. 8The credit may be taken against payments due for reporting 9periods that begin on or after January 1, 2020, and end on or 10before December 31, 2027. An employer may not claim a credit 11for an employee who has worked fewer than 90 consecutive days 12immediately preceding the reporting period; however, such 13credits may accrue during that 90-day period and be claimed 14against payments under this Section for future reporting 15periods after the employee has worked for the employer at 16least 90 consecutive days. In no event may the credit exceed 17the employer's liability for the reporting period. Each 18employer who deducts and withholds or is required to deduct 19and withhold tax under this Act and who retains income tax 20withholdings under this subsection must make a return with 21respect to such taxes and retained amounts in the form and 22manner that the Department, by rule, requires and pay to the 23Department or to a depositary designated by the Department 24those withheld taxes not retained by the employer. 25    For each reporting period, the employer may not claim a 26credit or credits for more employees than the number of   SB1834- 16 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1employees making less than the minimum or reduced wage for the 2current calendar year during the last reporting period of the 3preceding calendar year. Notwithstanding any other provision 4of this subsection, an employer shall not be eligible for 5credits for a reporting period unless the average wage paid by 6the employer per employee for all employees making less than 7$55,000 during the reporting period is greater than the 8average wage paid by the employer per employee for all 9employees making less than $55,000 during the same reporting 10period of the prior calendar year. 11    For purposes of this subsection (i): 12    "Compensation paid in Illinois" has the meaning ascribed 13to that term under Section 304(a)(2)(B) of this Act.14    "Employer" and "employee" have the meaning ascribed to 15those terms in the Minimum Wage Law, except that "employee" 16also includes employees who work for an employer with fewer 17than 4 employees. Employers that operate more than one 18establishment pursuant to a franchise agreement or that 19constitute members of a unitary business group shall aggregate 20their employees for purposes of determining eligibility for 21the credit.22    "Full-time equivalent employees" means the ratio of the 23number of paid hours during the reporting period and the 24number of working hours in that period.25    "Maximum credit" means the percentage listed below of the 26difference between the amount of compensation paid in Illinois   SB1834- 17 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1to employees who are paid not more than the required minimum 2wage reduced by the amount of compensation paid in Illinois to 3employees who were paid less than the current required minimum 4wage during the reporting period prior to each increase in the 5required minimum wage on January 1. If an employer pays an 6employee more than the required minimum wage and that employee 7previously earned less than the required minimum wage, the 8employer may include the portion that does not exceed the 9required minimum wage as compensation paid in Illinois to 10employees who are paid not more than the required minimum 11wage. 12        (1) 25% for reporting periods beginning on or after 13    January 1, 2020 and ending on or before December 31, 2020;14        (2) 21% for reporting periods beginning on or after 15    January 1, 2021 and ending on or before December 31, 2021;16        (3) 17% for reporting periods beginning on or after 17    January 1, 2022 and ending on or before December 31, 2022;18        (4) 13% for reporting periods beginning on or after 19    January 1, 2023 and ending on or before December 31, 2023;20        (5) 9% for reporting periods beginning on or after 21    January 1, 2024 and ending on or before December 31, 2024;22        (6) 5% for reporting periods beginning on or after 23    January 1, 2025 and ending on or before December 31, 2025.24    The amount computed under this subsection may continue to 25be claimed for reporting periods beginning on or after January 261, 2026 and:   SB1834- 18 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1        (A) ending on or before December 31, 2026 for 2    employers with more than 5 employees; or3        (B) ending on or before December 31, 2027 for 4    employers with no more than 5 employees. 5    "Qualified employee" means an employee who is paid not 6more than the required minimum wage and has an average wage 7paid per hour by the employer during the reporting period 8equal to or greater than his or her average wage paid per hour 9by the employer during each reporting period for the 10immediately preceding 12 months. A new qualified employee is 11deemed to have earned the required minimum wage in the 12preceding reporting period.13    "Reporting period" means the quarter for which a return is 14required to be filed under subsection (b) of this Section. 15    (j) For reporting periods beginning on or after January 1, 162023, if a private employer grants all of its employees the 17option of taking a paid leave of absence of at least 30 days 18for the purpose of serving as an organ donor or bone marrow 19donor, then the private employer may take a credit against the 20payments due under this Section in an amount equal to the 21amount withheld under this Section with respect to wages paid 22while the employee is on organ donation leave, not to exceed 23$1,000 in withholdings for each employee who takes organ 24donation leave. To be eligible for the credit, such a leave of 25absence must be taken without loss of pay, vacation time, 26compensatory time, personal days, or sick time for at least   SB1834- 19 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1the first 30 days of the leave of absence. The private employer 2shall adopt rules governing organ donation leave, including 3rules that (i) establish conditions and procedures for 4requesting and approving leave and (ii) require medical 5documentation of the proposed organ or bone marrow donation 6before leave is approved by the private employer. A private 7employer must provide, in the manner required by the 8Department, documentation from the employee's medical 9provider, which the private employer receives from the 10employee, that verifies the employee's organ donation. The 11private employer must also provide, in the manner required by 12the Department, documentation that shows that a qualifying 13organ donor leave policy was in place and offered to all 14qualifying employees at the time the leave was taken. For the 15private employer to receive the tax credit, the employee 16taking organ donor leave must allow for the applicable medical 17records to be disclosed to the Department. If the private 18employer cannot provide the required documentation to the 19Department, then the private employer is ineligible for the 20credit under this Section. A private employer must also 21provide, in the form required by the Department, any 22additional documentation or information required by the 23Department to administer the credit under this Section. The 24credit under this subsection (j) shall be taken within one 25year after the date upon which the organ donation leave 26begins. If the leave taken spans into a second tax year, the   SB1834- 20 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1employer qualifies for the allowable credit in the later of 2the 2 years. If the amount of credit exceeds the tax liability 3for the year, the excess may be carried and applied to the tax 4liability for the 3 taxable years following the excess credit 5year. The tax credit shall be applied to the earliest year for 6which there is a tax liability. If there are credits for more 7than one year that are available to offset liability, the 8earlier credit shall be applied first. 9    Nothing in this subsection (j) prohibits a private 10employer from providing an unpaid leave of absence to its 11employees for the purpose of serving as an organ donor or bone 12marrow donor; however, if the employer's policy provides for 13fewer than 30 days of paid leave for organ or bone marrow 14donation, then the employer shall not be eligible for the 15credit under this Section. 16    As used in this subsection (j):17    "Organ" means any biological tissue of the human body that 18may be donated by a living donor, including, but not limited 19to, the kidney, liver, lung, pancreas, intestine, bone, skin, 20or any subpart of those organs. 21    "Organ donor" means a person from whose body an organ is 22taken to be transferred to the body of another person. 23    "Private employer" means a sole proprietorship, 24corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other 25entity with one or more employees. "Private employer" does not 26include a municipality, county, State agency, or other public   SB1834- 21 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1employer. 2    This subsection (j) is exempt from the provisions of 3Section 250 of this Act.4    (k) For reporting periods beginning on or after January 1, 52025 and before January 1, 2027, an employer may claim a credit 6against payments due under this Section for amounts withheld 7during the first reporting period to occur after the date on 8which a tax credit certificate is issued for a non-profit 9theater production under Section 10 of the Live Theater 10Production Tax Credit Act. The credit shall be equal to the 11amount shown on the certificate, but may not reduce the 12taxpayer's obligation for any payment due under this Article 13to less than zero. If the amount of the credit exceeds the 14total amount due under this Article with respect to amounts 15withheld during the first reporting period to occur after the 16date on which a tax credit certificate is issued, the excess 17may be carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's 18liability under this Section for reporting periods that occur 19in the 5 succeeding calendar years. The excess credit shall be 20applied to the earliest reporting period for which there is a 21payment due under this Article. If there are credits from more 22than one reporting period that are available to offset a 23liability, the earlier credit shall be applied first. The 24Department of Revenue, in cooperation with the Department of 25Commerce and Economic Opportunity, shall adopt rules to 26enforce and administer the provisions of this subsection.   SB1834- 22 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1    (l) (k) A taxpayer who is issued a certificate under the 2Local Journalism Sustainability Act for a taxable year shall 3be allowed a credit against payments due under this Section as 4provided in that Act. 5    (m) An employer may claim a credit against payments due 6under this Section for amounts withheld during the first 7calendar year ending after the date on which a certificate of 8exemption was issued under the Job Creation Zone Pilot Program 9Act. The credit shall be equal to the amount shown on the 10certificate but may not reduce the taxpayer's obligation for 11any payment due under this Section to less than zero. If the 12amount of the credit exceeds the total payments due under this 13Section with respect to amounts withheld during the calendar 14year, the excess may be carried forward and applied against 15the taxpayer's liability under this Section in the 5 16succeeding calendar years. The credit shall be applied to the 17earliest year for which there is a tax liability. If there are 18credits from more than one calendar year that are available to 19offset a liability, the earlier credit shall be applied first. 20This subsection (k) is exempt from the provisions of Section 21250 of this Act. 22(Source: P.A. 102-669, eff. 11-16-21; 102-700, Article 30, 23Section 30-5, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 110, Section 24110-905, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1125, eff. 2-3-23; 103-592, Article 2540, Section 40-900, eff. 6-7-24; 103-592, Article 45, Section 2645-10, eff. 6-7-24; revised 7-9-24.)   SB1834- 23 -LRB104 03836 HLH 13860 b1    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.